Hawaii statutes.
[§844D-56] Limitations not cause for
dismissal. The limitation on the types of offenses set forth in section
844D‑31(a) that are subject to the collection and testing procedures of
this chapter is for the purpose of facilitating the administration of this
chapter by the department and shall not be considered cause for dismissing an
investigation or prosecution or reversing a verdict or a disposition. [L 2005,
c 112, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next